Alabama, session 2026rs, HB474.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
35 Section 1. Sections 16-25-20.1 and 36-27-25.1 are added
36 to the Code of Alabama 1975, to read as follows:
37 §16-25-20.1
38 (a) As used in this section, the following terms have
39 the following meanings:
40 (1) INVESTMENT ACTIVITIES. The act of investing or the
41 lending of assets of the Teachers' Retirement System of
42 Alabama.
43 (2) RESTRICTED ENTITY. All of the following:
44 a. A Chinese entity that is:
45 1. Designated by Presidential Executive Order 13959,
46 relating to addressing the threat from securities investments
47 that finance communist Chinese military companies;
48 2. Designated by presidential Executive Order 14105(88
49 Fed. Reg. 54867), relating to addressing United States
50 investments in certain national security technologies and
51 products in countries of concern; and
52 3. Included in the List of Specially Designated
53 Nationals and Blocked Persons maintained by the U.S.
54 Department of the Treasury, Office of Foreign Assets Control.
55 b. A Chinese entity that is:
56 1. Included on the Non-SDN Chinese Military-Industrial
Page 2

1. Included on the Non-SDN Chinese Military-Industrial
HB474 INTRODUCED
57 Complex Companies List (NS-CMIC List) maintained by the U.S.
58 Department of the Treasury, Office of Foreign Assets Control
59 under Presidential Executive Order 14032;
60 2. A Chinese military company or a military-civil
61 fusion contributor and included on the list maintained by the
62 Department of Defense in accordance with Section 1260H(b) of
63 the National Defense Authorization Act for fiscal year 2021;
64 3. Included on the list required under Section 1237 of
65 the National Defense Authorization Act for fiscal year 1999;
66 4. Included on the Entity List in 15 C.F.R. Supplement
67 No. 4 to Part 744 of the federal government's Export
68 Administration regulations;
69 5. Included on the Denied Persons List described in 15
70 C.F.R. § 764.3(a)(2) of the federal government's Export
71 Administration regulations;
72 6. Included on the Unverified List set forth in 15
73 C.F.R. Supplement No.6 to Part 744 of the Export
74 Administration regulations;
75 7. Included on the Military End User List set forth in
76 15 C.F.R. Supplement No.7 to Part 744 of the Export
77 Administration regulations;
78 8. Produces or provides communications equipment or
79 service on the list published by the Federal Communications
80 Commission under 47 U.S.C. § 1601(a) of the Secure and Trusted
81 Communications Networks Act of 2019;
82 9. Included on the Uyghur Forced Labor Prevention Act
83 entity list maintained by the Department of Homeland Security;
84 10. Included on the Withhold Release Orders and
Page 3

10. Included on the Withhold Release Orders and
HB474 INTRODUCED
85 Findings List maintained by the Commissioner of U.S. Customs
86 and Border Protection pursuant to the Uyghur Forced Labor
87 Prevention Act 88 Fed. Reg. 85899;
88 11. Included on the list of covered issuers, as defined
89 in Section 104 of the Sarbanes Oxley Act of 2002 15 U.S.C. §
90 7214, maintained by the Securities and Exchange Commission;
91 and
92 12. Otherwise included on any other list maintained by
93 the United States Government that designates a Chinese entity
94 for a restriction relating to investment, contracting, or
95 procurement.
96 c. A Chinese entity otherwise subject to the control of
97 a Chinese entity listed in paragraph a. or b.
98 d. Any agency or instrumentality of the People's
99 Republic of China.
100 (b) The State Auditor or his or her designee, no later
101 than January 1, 2027, shall create a list of restricted
102 entities and shall update the list every six months
103 thereafter. The retirement system shall not engage in
104 investment activities with a listed restricted entity.
105 (c) Upon publication of the restricted entity list, the
106 Board of Control shall identify any holdings of the retirement
107 system in a restricted entity and, acting as a prudent
108 investor, shall expeditiously divest from any holdings or
109 other investment activity in that restricted entity.
110 §36-27-25.1
111 (a) As used in this section, the following terms have
112 the following meanings:
Page 4

the following meanings:
HB474 INTRODUCED
113 (1) INVESTMENT ACTIVITIES. The act of investing or the
114 lending of assets of the retirement system.
115 (2) RESTRICTED ENTITY. All of the following:
116 a. A Chinese entity that is:
117 1. Designated by Presidential Executive Order 13959,
118 relating to addressing the threat from securities investments
119 that finance communist Chinese military companies;
120 2. Designated by Presidential Executive Order 14105 (88
121 Fed. Reg. 54867), relating to addressing United States
122 investments in certain national security technologies and
123 products in countries of concern; and
124 3. Included in the List of Specially Designated
125 Nationals and Blocked Persons maintained by the U.S.
126 Department of the Treasury, Office of Foreign Assets Control.
127 b. A Chinese entity that is:
128 1. Included on the Non-SDN Chinese Military-Industrial
129 Complex Companies List (NS-CMIC List) maintained by the U.S.
130 Department of the Treasury, Office of Foreign Assets Control
131 under Presidential Executive Order 14032;
132 2. A Chinese military company or a military-civil
133 fusion contributor and included on the list maintained by the
134 Department of Defense in accordance with Section 1260H(b) of
135 the National Defense Authorization Act for fiscal year 2021;
136 3. Included on the list required under Section 1237 of
137 the National Defense Authorization Act for fiscal year 1999;
138 4. Included on the Entity List in 15 C.F.R. Supplement
139 No. 4 to Part 744 of the federal government's Export
140 Administration regulations;
Page 5

Administration regulations;
HB474 INTRODUCED
141 5. Included on the Denied Persons List described in 15
142 C.F.R. § 764.3(a)(2) of the federal government's Export
143 Administration regulations;
144 6. Included on the Unverified List set forth in 15
145 C.F.R. Supplement No.6 to Part 744 of the Export
146 Administration regulations;
147 7. Included on the Military End User List set forth in
148 15 C.F.R. Supplement No.7 to Part 744 of the Export
149 Administration regulations;
150 8. Produces or provides communications equipment or
151 service on the list published by the Federal Communications
152 Commission under 47 U.S.C. § 1601(a) of the Secure and Trusted
153 Communications Networks Act of 2019;
154 9. Included on the Uyghur Forced Labor Prevention Act
155 entity list maintained by the Department of Homeland Security;
156 10. Included on the Withhold Release Orders and
157 Findings List maintained by the Commissioner of U.S. Customs
158 and Border Protection pursuant to the Uyghur Forced Labor
159 Prevention Act 88 Fed. Reg. 855899;
160 11. Included on the list of covered issuers, as defined
161 in Section 104 of the Sarbanes Oxley Act of 2002, 15 U.S.C. §
162 7214, maintained by the Securities and Exchange Commission;
163 and
164 12. Otherwise included on any other list maintained by
165 the United States Government that designates a Chinese entity
166 for a restriction relating to investment, contracting, or
167 procurement.
168 c. A Chinese entity otherwise subject to the control of
Page 6

c. A Chinese entity otherwise subject to the control of
HB474 INTRODUCED
169 a Chinese entity listed in paragraph b.
170 d. Any agency or instrumentality of the People's
171 Republic of China.
172 (b) The State Auditor or his or her designee, no later
173 than January 1, 2027, shall create a list of restricted
174 entities and shall update the list every six months
175 thereafter. The retirement system shall not engage in
176 investment activities with a listed restricted entity.
177 (c) Upon publication of the restricted entity list, the
178 Board of Control shall identify any holdings of the retirement
179 system in a restricted entity and, acting as a prudent
180 investor, shall expeditiously divest from any holdings or
181 other investment activity in that restricted entity.
182 Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
183 1, 2026.
Page 7